California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(C) The amount of the examination fees shall be based on the actual cost to the board of developing, purchasing, and grading each examination and the actual cost to the board of administering each examination. The written examination fees shall be adjusted periodically by regulation to reflect the actual costs incurred by the board.

(5) The fee for rescoring an examination shall be twenty dollars ($20).

(6) The fee for issuance of an initial license shall be two hundred dollars ($200). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of four hundred dollars ($400).

(7) The fee for the two-year license renewal shall be two hundred dollars ($200). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up
 to a maximum of four hundred dollars ($400).

(8) The renewal delinquency fee shall be one-half of the fee for license renewal. A person who permits their license to expire shall be subject to the delinquency fee.

(9) The fee for issuance of a replacement registration, license, or certificate shall be twenty dollars ($20).

(10) The fee for issuance of a certificate or letter of good standing shall be twenty-five dollars ($25).

(11) The fee for issuance of a retired license shall be forty dollars ($40).

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2021.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 647, Sec. 50.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4996.4.

(a) Effective January 1, 2016, an applicant who fails the clinical examination may, within one year from the notification date of failure, retake that examination as regularly scheduled, without further application, upon payment of the required examination fees. Thereafter, the applicant shall not be eligible for further examination until he or she files a new application, meets all current requirements,
 and pays all required fees.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2016.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 799, Sec. 57) by Stats. 2013, Ch. 473, Sec. 47.   (SB 821)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Section operative January 1, 2016, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4996.5.

The board shall issue a license to each applicant meeting the requirements of this article, which license, so long as the renewal fees have been paid, licenses the holder to engage in the practice of clinical social work as defined in Section 4996.9, entitles the holder to use the title of licensed clinical social worker, and authorizes the holder to hold himself or herself out as qualified to perform any of the functions
 delineated by this chapter. The form and content of the license shall be determined by the director in accordance with Section 164.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 307, Sec. 62.   (SB 821)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4996.6.

(a) Licenses issued under this chapter shall expire no more than 24 months after the issue date. The expiration date of the original license shall be set by the board.

(b) To renew an unexpired license, the licensee shall, on or before the expiration date of the license, complete the following actions:

(1) Apply for a renewal on a form prescribed by the board.

(2) Pay a two-year renewal fee prescribed by the board.

(3) Certify compliance with the continuing education requirements set forth in Section 4996.22.

(4) Notify the board whether he or she has been convicted, as defined in Section 490, of a misdemeanor or felony, or whether any disciplinary action has been taken by any regulatory or licensing board in this or any other state, subsequent to the licensee’s last renewal.

(c) To renew an expired license within three years of its expiration, the licensee shall, as a condition precedent to renewal, complete all of the actions described in subdivision (b) and pay a delinquency fee.

(d) A license that is not renewed within three years after its expiration may not be renewed, restored, reinstated, or reissued thereafter; however, the former licensee may apply for and obtain a new license if he or she satisfies all of the following requirements:

(1) No fact, circumstance, or condition exists that, if the license were issued, would justify its revocation or suspension.

(2) He or she submits an application for licensure.

(3) He or she takes and passes the current licensing examinations.

(4) He or she submits the licensure application fees and the fee for initial license issuance.

(5) He or she complies with the fingerprint requirements established by board
 regulation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 573, Sec. 13.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4996.61.

A suspended license is subject to expiration and shall be renewed as provided in this article, but such renewal does not entitle the licensee, while the license remains suspended and until it is reinstated, to engage in the activity to which the license relates, or in any other activity or conduct in violation of the order or judgment by which it was suspended.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 647, Sec. 55.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4996.62.

A revoked license is subject to expiration as provided in this article, but it may not be renewed. If it is reinstated after its expiration, the licensee shall, as a condition precedent to its reinstatement, pay a reinstatement fee in an amount equal to the renewal fee in effect on the last regular renewal date before the date on which it is reinstated, plus the delinquency fee, if any, accrued at the time of its revocation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 647, Sec. 56.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4996.65.

(a) In addition to the fees charged pursuant to Section 4996.3 for the biennial renewal of a license pursuant to Section 4996.6, the board shall collect an additional fee of twenty dollars ($20) at the time of renewal. The board shall transfer this amount to the Controller who shall deposit the funds in the Mental Health Practitioner Education Fund.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2018.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 5) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 557, Sec. 6.   (AB 1188)   Effective October 7, 2017.   Section operative July 1, 2018, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4996.7.

A licensee shall display their license in a conspicuous place in the licensee’s primary place of practice when rendering professional clinical services in person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 160, Sec. 11.   (SB 1024)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4996.75.

(a) A licensee or registrant shall provide a client with a notice written in at least 12-point type prior to initiating psychotherapy services, or as soon as practicably possible thereafter, that reads as follows: 

NOTICE TO CLIENTS

The Board of Behavioral Sciences receives and responds to complaints regarding services provided within the scope of practice of clinical social workers. You may contact the board online at www.bbs.ca.gov, or by calling (916) 574-7830.

(b) On and after July 1, 2025, upon
 initiation of psychotherapy services with a client, the notice described in subdivision (a) shall also include the licensee’s or registrant’s full name as filed with the board, the license or registration number, the type of license or registration, and the license or registration expiration date. 

(c) Delivery of the notice required by this section to the client shall be documented.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 160, Sec. 12.   (SB 1024)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4996.9.

The practice of clinical social work is defined as a service in which a special knowledge of social resources, human capabilities, and the part that unconscious motivation plays in determining behavior, is directed at helping people to achieve more adequate, satisfying, and productive social adjustments. The application of social work principles and methods includes, but is not restricted to, counseling and using applied
 psychotherapy of a nonmedical nature with individuals, families, or groups; providing information and referral services; providing or arranging for the provision of social services; explaining or interpreting the psychosocial aspects in the situations of individuals, families, or groups; helping communities to organize, to provide, or to improve social or health services; doing research related to social work; and the use, application, and integration of the coursework and experience required by Sections 4996.2 and 4996.23.

Psychotherapy, within the meaning of this chapter, is the use of psychosocial methods within a professional relationship, to assist the person or persons to achieve a better psychosocial adaptation, to acquire greater human realization of psychosocial potential and adaptation, and to modify internal and external conditions which affect individuals, groups, or communities in respect to behavior, emotions, and thinking, in respect to their
 intrapersonal and interpersonal processes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 473, Sec. 48.   (SB 821)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

4996.10.

The provisions of this article shall be construed only as provisions relating to the examination and licensing of clinical social workers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 820, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4996.11.

The board may suspend or revoke the license of any person who is guilty on the grounds set forth in Section 4992.3. The proceedings for the suspension or revocation of licenses under this article shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the board shall have all the powers granted in that chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 820, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4996.12.

Any person who violates this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding a period of six months, or by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 820, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4996.13.

Nothing in this article shall prevent qualified members of other professional groups from doing work of a psychosocial nature consistent with the standards and ethics of their respective professions. However, they shall not hold themselves out to the public by any title or description of services incorporating the words psychosocial, or clinical social worker, or that they shall not state or imply that they are licensed to
 practice clinical social work. These qualified members of other professional groups include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) A physician and surgeon certified pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000).

(b) A psychologist licensed pursuant to Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 2900).

(c) Members of the State Bar of California.

(d) Marriage and family therapists licensed pursuant to Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 4980).

(e) Licensed professional clinical counselors pursuant to Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 4999.10).

(f) A priest, rabbi, or minister of the gospel of any religious
 denomination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 350, Sec. 36.   (SB 943)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4996.14.

(a) This chapter shall not be construed to constrict, limit, or withdraw the Medical Practice Act, the Licensed Marriage and Family Therapist Act, the Nursing Practice Act, the Licensed Professional Clinical Counselor Act, or the Psychology Licensing Law.

(b) This chapter shall not apply to an unlicensed or unregistered employee or volunteer working in a governmental entity, a school, a college, a university, or an institution that is both nonprofit and charitable if both of the following apply:

(1) The work of the employee or volunteer is performed under the oversight and direction of the entity.

(2) (A) On and after July 1, 2020, the employee or volunteer provides a client, prior to initiating psychotherapy services or as soon as practicably possible thereafter, a notice written in at least 12-point type that is in substantially the following form:

NOTICE TO CLIENTS

The (Name of office or unit) of the (Name of agency) receives and responds to complaints regarding the practice of psychotherapy by any unlicensed or unregistered practitioner providing services at (Name of agency). To file a complaint, contact (Telephone number, email address, internet website, or mailing address of agency).

The Board of Behavioral Sciences receives and responds
 to complaints regarding services provided by individuals licensed and registered by the board. If you have a complaint and are unsure if your practitioner is licensed or registered, please contact the Board of Behavioral Sciences at 916-574-7830 for assistance or utilize the board’s online license verification feature by visiting www.bbs.ca.gov.
(B) The delivery of the notice described in subparagraph (A) to the client shall be documented.

(c) This chapter shall not apply to a person using hypnotic techniques if their client was referred by a physician and surgeon, dentist, or psychologist.

(d) This chapter shall not apply to a person using hypnotic techniques that offer
 vocational self-improvement, and the person is not performing therapy for emotional or mental disorders.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivisions (b) and (c) or Section 4996.13, all persons registered as associates or licensed under this chapter shall not be exempt from this chapter or the jurisdiction of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 747, Sec. 10.5.   (AB 690)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4996.14.1.

The settings described in Section 4996.14 are exempt settings and do not fall under the jurisdiction of this chapter or of the board except as specified in Section 4996.14, and with the following exceptions:

(a) Any individual working or volunteering in an exempt setting who is licensed or registered under this chapter shall fall under the jurisdiction of the board and is not exempt from this chapter.

(b) An entity that is licensed or certified by a government regulatory agency to provide health care services shall not be considered an exempt setting unless the entity directly meets the criteria described in Section 4996.14.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 747, Sec. 11.   (AB 690)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4996.14.2.

(a) For the purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Nonexempt setting” means a setting that does not qualify as an exempt setting, as specified in Section 4996.14.

(2) “Private practice” means a type of nonexempt setting that meets all of the following criteria: 

(A) The practice is owned by a health professional who is licensed under this division either independently or jointly with one or more other health professionals who are licensed under this division.

(B) The practice provides clinical mental health services, including psychotherapy, to clients.

(C) One or more licensed health professionals are responsible for the practice and for the services provided and set conditions of client payment or reimbursement for the provision of services.

(3) “Professional corporation” means a type of nonexempt setting and private practice that has been formed pursuant to Part 4 (commencing with Section 13400) of Division 3 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code.

(b) An active license or registration number shall be required to engage in the practice of clinical social work, as defined in Section 4996.9, in nonexempt settings at all times, except as follows: 

(1) A social work intern may engage in the practice of clinical social work in a nonexempt setting that is not a private practice or a professional corporation, while pursuing a course of study leading to a master’s degree in social work pursuant to Section 4996.15.

(2) An applicant for registration as an associate may engage in the practice of clinical social work in a nonexempt setting that is not a private practice or a professional corporation before their registration number is issued if they are in compliance with subdivision (b) of Section 4996.23 and are gaining supervised experience that meets the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 747, Sec. 12.   (AB 690)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4996.15.

(a) Nothing in this article shall restrict or prevent psychosocial activities by employees of accredited academic institutions, public schools, government agencies, or nonprofit institutions who train graduate students pursuing a master’s degree in social work in an accredited college or university. Any psychosocial activities by the employee shall be part of a supervised course of study and the graduate students shall be designated by titles such as social work interns, social work trainees, or other titles clearly indicating the training status appropriate to their level of training. The term “social work intern,” however, shall be reserved for persons enrolled in a master’s or doctoral training program in social work in an accredited school
 or department of social work.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a graduate student shall not perform clinical social work in a private practice or a professional corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 747, Sec. 13.   (AB 690)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4996.16.

Nothing in this chapter shall apply to any clinical social worker from outside this state, when in actual consultation with a licensed practitioner of this state, or when an invited guest of a professional association, or of an educational institution for the sole purpose of engaging in professional education through lectures, clinics, or demonstrations, if he or she is at the time of the consultation, lecture, or demonstration licensed to practice clinical social work in the state or country in which he or she resides. These clinical social workers shall not
 open an office or appoint a place to meet clients or receive calls from clients within the limits of this state.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 26, Sec. 187.   Effective March 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4996.16.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 4996, a person who holds a license in another jurisdiction of the United States as a clinical social worker may provide clinical social work services in this state for a period not to exceed 30 consecutive days in any calendar year, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The license from another jurisdiction is at the highest level for independent clinical practice in the jurisdiction in which the license was granted.

(2) The license from another jurisdiction is current, active, and unrestricted.

(3) The client is located
 in California during the time the person seeks to provide care in California.

(4) The client is a current client of the person and has an established, ongoing client-provider relationship with the person at the time the client became located in California.

(5) The person informs the client of the limited timeframe of the services and that the person is not licensed in California.

(6) The person provides the client with the Board of Behavioral Sciences’ internet website address.

(7) The person informs the client of the jurisdiction in which the person is licensed and the type of license held and provides the client with the person’s license number.

(b) A person who intends to provide clinical social work services pursuant to this section shall provide the board with all of the following information before providing services:

(1) The name under which the person is licensed in another jurisdiction, the person’s mailing address, the person’s phone number, the person’s social security number or individual taxpayer identification number, and the person’s electronic mailing address, if the person has an electronic mailing address.

(2) The jurisdiction in which the person is licensed, the type of license held, and the license number.

(3) The date on which the person will begin providing clinical social work
 services to the person’s client in California.

(c) A person who provides services pursuant to this section shall submit a signed statement, under penalty of perjury, acknowledging that they are subject to the jurisdiction of the board and agreeing to be bound by the laws of this state.

(d) This section does not apply to any person licensed by the board whose license has been suspended or revoked.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 81.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4996.17.1.

The board may issue a license to a person who, at the time of submitting an application for a license pursuant to this chapter, holds a license in another jurisdiction of the United States as a clinical social worker at the highest level for independent practice if all of the following requirements are met:

(a) The applicant’s license in the other jurisdiction has been current, active, and unrestricted for at least two years immediately
 before the date the application was received by the board. The applicant shall disclose to the board for review any past restrictions or disciplinary actions on an out-of-state license and the board shall consider these actions in determining whether to issue a license to the applicant.

(b) The applicant’s degree that qualified the applicant for the out-of-state license is a master’s degree from an accredited school or department of social work.

(c) The applicant complies with the fingerprint requirements established in Section 144.

(d) The applicant completes the coursework specified in paragraphs (1) and (2) from an accredited school or department of social work, a school, college, or university accredited by a regional or national institutional accrediting agency that is recognized by the United States Department
 of Education, a school, college, or university that is approved by the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education, or from a continuing education provider that is identified as acceptable by the board pursuant to Section 4996.22. Undergraduate coursework shall not satisfy these requirements.

(1) A minimum of 12 hours of coursework in California law and professional ethics. The content of the course shall include, but not be limited to, the following: advertising, scope of practice, scope of competence, treatment of minors, confidentiality, dangerous patients, psychotherapist-patient privilege, recordkeeping, patient access to records, state and federal laws related to confidentiality of patient health information, dual relationships, child abuse, elder and dependent adult abuse, online therapy, insurance reimbursement, civil liability, disciplinary actions and unprofessional conduct, ethics complaints and ethical standards, termination of
 therapy, standards of care, relevant family law, therapist disclosures to patients, the application of legal and ethical standards in different types of work settings, and licensing law and process.

(2) At least one semester unit, or 15 hours, of instruction that includes an understanding of various California cultures and the social and psychological implications of socioeconomic position.

(e) The applicant obtains a minimum of seven contact hours of training or coursework in child abuse assessment and reporting, as specified in Section 28, and any regulations promulgated thereunder.

(f) On and after January 1, 2021, the applicant shall show proof of completion of at least six hours of coursework or applied experience under supervision in suicide risk assessment and intervention using one of the methods specified in
 Section 4996.27.

(g) The applicant passes the board-administered California law and ethics examination required in Section 4996.1. The clinical examination required in Section 4996.1 shall be waived for an applicant qualifying under this section.

(h) This section was developed based on an examination of the licensure requirements for clinical social workers on a national level. This section shall not be construed to apply to any provisions under this division or Division 3 (commencing with Section 5000) other than this act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 380, Sec. 9.   (SB 679)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4996.17.2.

(a) This section applies to persons with education gained from an out-of-state school or experience gained outside of California who apply for licensure or registration and who do not qualify for a license under Section 4996.17.1.

(b) The board shall accept experience gained outside of California for the purpose of satisfying the licensure requirements if the experience is substantially the equivalent to the requirements of this chapter. If the applicant has fewer than 3,000 hours of qualifying supervised experience, the board shall accept as qualifying experience the amount of time the applicant held an active license in good standing in another state or country as a clinical social worker at the highest level for independent practice at a rate of 100 hours per
 month, up to a maximum of 1,200 hours.

(c) The board shall accept education gained from an out-of-state school for purposes of satisfying licensure or registration requirements if the applicant has received a master’s degree from an accredited school of social work, or complies with subdivision (e) of Section 4996.18.

(d) In addition to the experience and education described in subdivisions (b) and (c), the applicant shall pass, or have passed, the licensing examinations as specified in Section 4996.1 and pay the required fees. Issuance of the license is conditioned upon all of the following:

(1) The applicant has supervised experience as described in subdivision (b).

(2) Completion of the coursework or training specified in this paragraph taken from an
 accredited school or department of social work, a school, college, or university accredited by a regional or national institutional accrediting agency that is recognized by the United States Department of Education, a school, college, or university that is approved by the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education, or from a continuing education provider that is identified as acceptable to the board pursuant to Section 4996.22. Undergraduate coursework shall not satisfy this requirement. This coursework may be completed while registered as an associate, unless otherwise specified.

(A) A minimum of seven contact hours of training or coursework in child abuse assessment and reporting, as specified in Section 28, and any regulations promulgated thereunder.

(B) A minimum of 10 contact hours of training or coursework in human sexuality, as specified in Section 25, and any regulations
 promulgated thereunder.

(C) A minimum of 15 contact hours of training or coursework in alcoholism and other chemical substance dependency, as specified by regulation.

(D) A minimum of 15 contact hours of coursework or training in spousal or partner abuse assessment, detection, and intervention strategies.

(E) A minimum of 10 contact hours of coursework in aging and long-term care, as specified in Section 4996.25.

(F) Completion of a 12-hour course in California law and professional ethics. The content of the course shall include, but not be limited to, the following: advertising, scope of practice, scope of competence, treatment of minors, confidentiality, dangerous patients, psychotherapist-patient privilege, recordkeeping, patient access to records,
 state and federal laws related to confidentiality of patient health information, dual relationships, child abuse, elder and dependent adult abuse, online therapy, insurance reimbursement, civil liability, disciplinary actions and unprofessional conduct, ethics complaints and ethical standards, termination of therapy, standards of care, relevant family law, therapist disclosures to patients, the application of legal and ethical standards in different types of work settings, and licensing law and process. This coursework shall be completed before registration as an associate.

(G) At least one semester unit, or 15 hours, of instruction that includes an understanding of various California cultures and the social and psychological implications of socioeconomic position.

(3) On and after January 1, 2021, an applicant for licensure shall show proof of completion of at least six hours of
 coursework or applied experience under supervision in suicide risk assessment and intervention using one of the methods specified in Section 4996.27.

(4) The applicant’s license is in good standing and is not suspended, revoked, restricted, sanctioned, or voluntarily surrendered in any state.

(5) The applicant is not currently under investigation in any other state, and has not been charged with an offense for any act substantially related to the practice of social work by any public agency, entered into any consent agreement or been subject to an administrative decision that contains conditions placed by an agency upon an applicant’s professional conduct or practice, including any voluntary surrender of license, or been the subject of an adverse judgment resulting from the practice of social work that the board determines constitutes evidence of a pattern of incompetence or
 negligence.

(6) The applicant shall provide a certification from each state where the applicant holds a license pertaining to licensure, disciplinary action, and complaints pending.

(7) The applicant is not subject to denial of licensure under Section 480, 4992.3, 4992.35, or 4992.36.

(e) An applicant who obtained a license or registration under another state or country may qualify for licensure with the board without taking the clinical examination specified in Section 4996.1 if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The applicant obtained a passing score on the clinical licensing examination set forth in regulation as accepted by the board.

(2) The applicant’s license or
 registration in that state or country is active and in good standing at the time of the application and is not revoked, suspended, surrendered, denied, or otherwise restricted or encumbered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 647, Sec. 52.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4996.18.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 4996.23, an applicant shall have an active registration with the board as an associate clinical social worker in order to gain hours of supervised experience. The application shall be made on a form prescribed by the board.

(b) An applicant for registration shall satisfy the following requirements:

(1) Possess a master’s degree from an accredited school or department of social work.

(2) Not be subject to denial of licensure pursuant to Section 480.

(3) Have completed training or coursework, which may be embedded within
 more than one course, in California law and professional ethics for clinical social workers. The coursework shall be taken from an accredited school or department of social work, a school, college, or university accredited by a regional or national institutional accrediting agency that is recognized by the United States Department of Education, a school, college, or university that is approved by the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education, or from a continuing education provider that is acceptable to the board, as defined in Section 4996.22. Undergraduate coursework shall not satisfy this requirement. The coursework shall include instruction in all of the following areas of study:

(A) Contemporary professional ethics and statutes, regulations, and court decisions that delineate the scope of practice of clinical social work.

(B) The therapeutic, clinical, and practical
 considerations involved in the legal and ethical practice of clinical social work, including, but not limited to, family law.

(C) The current legal patterns and trends in the mental health professions.

(D) The psychotherapist-patient privilege, confidentiality, dangerous patients, and the treatment of minors with and without parental consent.

(E) A recognition and exploration of the relationship between a practitioner’s sense of self and human values, and the practitioner’s professional behavior and ethics.

(F) The application of legal and ethical standards in different types of work settings.

(G) Licensing law and process.

(c) An applicant who possesses a master’s degree from a school or department of social work that is a candidate for accreditation by the Commission on Accreditation of the Council on Social Work Education shall be eligible, and, except as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 4996.23, shall be required to register as an associate clinical social worker in order to gain experience toward licensure if the applicant is not subject to denial of licensure pursuant to Section 480. That applicant shall not, however, be eligible to take the clinical examination until the school or department of social work has received accreditation by the Commission on Accreditation of the Council on Social Work Education.

(d) An applicant who possesses a master’s degree from an accredited school or department of social work shall be able to apply experience the applicant obtained during the time the accredited school or department was in candidacy
 status by the Commission on Accreditation of the Council on Social Work Education toward the licensure requirements, if the experience meets the requirements of Section 4996.23. This subdivision shall apply retroactively to persons who possess a master’s degree from an accredited school or department of social work and who obtained experience during the time the accredited school or department was in candidacy status by the Commission on Accreditation of the Council on Social Work Education.

(e) An applicant for registration or licensure trained in an educational institution outside the United States shall demonstrate to the satisfaction of the board that the applicant possesses a master’s of social work degree that is equivalent to a master’s degree issued from a school or department of social work that is accredited by the Commission on Accreditation of the Council on Social Work Education. These applicants shall provide the board with a
 comprehensive evaluation of the degree and shall provide any other documentation the board deems necessary. The board has the authority to make the final determination as to whether a degree meets all requirements, including, but not limited to, course requirements regardless of evaluation or accreditation.

(f) All applicants for licensure and registrants shall be at all times under the supervision of a supervisor who shall be responsible for ensuring that the extent, kind, and quality of counseling performed is consistent with the training and experience of the person being supervised and who shall be responsible to the board for compliance with all laws governing the practice of clinical social work.

(g) All applicants and registrants shall inform each client or patient before performing any professional services that the applicant or registrant is unlicensed and is under the
 supervision of a licensed professional.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 647, Sec. 53.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4996.19.

Nothing in this article shall prohibit the acts or practices of a licensed clinical social workers’ corporation duly certificated pursuant to the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act, as contained in Part 4 (commencing with Section 13400) of Division 3 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code and Article 5 (commencing with Section 4998), when the corporation is in compliance with (a) the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act; (b) Article 5 (commencing with Section 4998); and (c) all other statutes and all rules and regulations now or hereafter enacted or adopted pertaining to the
 corporation and the conduct of its affairs.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 4996.18 by Stats. 1987, Ch. 826, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

4996.20.

(a) “Supervisor,” as used in this chapter, means an individual who meets all of the following requirements:

(1) Has held an active license for at least two years within the five-year period immediately preceding any supervision as either:

(A) A licensed professional clinical counselor, licensed marriage and family therapist, psychologist licensed pursuant to Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 2900), licensed clinical social worker, licensed educational psychologist, or equivalent out-of-state license. A licensed educational psychologist may only supervise the provision of educationally related mental health services
 that are consistent with the scope of practice of an educational psychologist, as specified in Section 4989.14.

(B) A physician and surgeon who is certified in psychiatry by the American Board of Psychiatry and Neurology or an out-of-state licensed physician and surgeon who is certified in psychiatry by the American Board of Psychiatry and Neurology.

(2) For at least two years within the five-year period immediately preceding any supervision, has practiced psychotherapy, provided psychological counseling pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 4989.14, or provided direct clinical supervision of psychotherapy performed by associate clinical social workers, associate marriage and family therapists or trainees, or associate professional clinical counselors. Supervision of
 psychotherapy performed by a social work intern or a professional clinical counselor trainee shall be accepted if the supervision provided is substantially equivalent to the supervision required for registrants.

(3) Has received training in supervision as specified in this chapter and by regulation.

(4) Has not provided therapeutic services to the supervisee.

(5) Has and maintains a current and active license that is not under suspension or probation as one of the following:

(A) A marriage and family therapist, professional clinical counselor, clinical social worker, or licensed educational psychologist issued by the board.

(B) A psychologist licensed pursuant to Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 2900).

(C) A physician and surgeon who is certified in psychiatry by the American Board of Psychiatry and Neurology.

(6) Is not a spouse, domestic partner, or relative of the supervisee.

(7) Does not currently have or previously had a personal, professional, or business relationship with the supervisee that undermines the authority or effectiveness of the supervision.

(b) As used in this chapter, the term “supervision” means responsibility for, and control of, the quality of mental health and related services provided by the supervisee. Consultation or peer discussion
 shall not be considered supervision and shall not qualify as supervised experience.

“Supervision” includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:
